Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.005

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to establish a state system of licensure and regulation to ensure the safe and sound operation of money transmission and currency exchange businesses, to ensure that these businesses are not used for criminal purposes, to promote confidence in the state's financial system, and to protect the public interest.

[ 2003 c 287 s 2.]